Georgia, session 2025_26, HB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 50 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
licensing, is amended by revising Code Section 43-50-31, relating to application for license,
qualifications, and recordation of license, as follows:
"43-50-31.
(a) Any person desiring a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state shall make
application to the board. The application shall include evidence, satisfactory to the board,
that:
(1) The applicant has attained the age of 18;
(2) The applicant is of good moral character;
H. B. 91 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 57 0255S
(3)(A) The applicant:
(i) Is is a graduate of an accredited college or a school of veterinary medicine
accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association Council on Education or
possesses an ECFVG or PAVE certificate or substantial equivalent; and
(4)(ii) Has The applicant has passed a board approved examination; provided,
however, that the board may provide by rule or regulation for a waiver of any part of
such examination for veterinarians who are licensed as such by another state and who
are in good standing therewith; or
(B) The applicant:
(i) Is a graduate of a foreign college or school of veterinary medicine and has
submitted a transcript certifying completion of his or her education in veterinary
medicine. In support of such certification of completion, such graduate may submit:
(I) An ECFVG certificate or its substantial equivalent;
(II) A PAVE certificate or its substantial equivalent; or
(III) Any other document as authorized by the board; and
(ii) Has completed a residency program or similar training duration program of two
or more years and has received board certification from a veterinary medicine
specialty organization recognized by the American Veterinary Medical Association,
the American Board of Veterinary Specialties, or other American Veterinary Medical
Association board approved organization; provided, however, that such applicant
upon licensure shall only be authorized to practice veterinary medicine in the area of
his or her certified veterinary medicine specialty; and provided, further, that any other
practice of veterinary medicine shall be deemed a violation of subsection (a) of Code
Section 43-50-30 and subsection (a) of Code Section 43-50-45; and
(5)(4) The applicant meets such other qualifications or provides such other information
as the board may require by rule.
(b) The application shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount established by the board.
H. B. 91 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 57 0255S
(c) The division director shall record the new licenses and issue such licenses to the new
licensees.
(d) If an applicant is found not qualified for licensure, the board shall notify the applicant
in writing of such finding and the grounds therefor. Such applicant may request a hearing
before the board on the questions of his or her qualifications."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 43-50-44, relating to exemptions from article,
by adding a new subparagraph to paragraph (2) to read as follows:
"(2)(A) A person who is a regular student in a veterinary school or school of veterinary
technology performing duties or actions assigned by his or her instructors or working
under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian;
(B) A member of the faculty, a resident, an intern, or a graduate student of an
accredited college or school of veterinary medicine or school of veterinary technology
performing his or her regular clinical or nonclinical functions or a person lecturing or
giving instructions or demonstrations at an accredited college or school of veterinary
medicine or school of veterinary technology in connection with a continuing education
course or seminar;
(B.1) A person licensed pursuant to subparagraph (a)(2)(B) of Code Section 43-50-31
from lecturing or giving instructions or demonstrations in an area within such person's
certified veterinary medicine specialty at an accredited college or school of veterinary
medicine or school of veterinary technology and in connection with a continuing
education course or seminar; or
(C) A graduate of a foreign college or school of veterinary medicine who is in the
process of obtaining the ECFVG or PAVE certificate or substantial equivalent
performing duties or actions under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian;"
H. B. 91 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 57 0255S
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 91 (SUB)
- 4 -